Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-2605
State assistance; application; contents.

(1) All applications for state assistance under the Convention Center Facility Financing Assistance Act shall be in writing and shall include a certified copy of the approving action of the governing body of the applicant describing the proposed eligible facility and the anticipated financing.

(2) The application shall contain:

(a) A description of the proposed financing of the eligible facility, including the estimated principal and interest requirements for the bonds proposed to be issued in connection with the eligible facility or the amounts necessary to repay the original investment by the applicant in the eligible facility;

(b) Documentation of local financial commitment to support the project, including all public and private resources pledged or committed to the project;

(c) A map identifying the area to be used in determining associated hotels and nearby retailers; and

(d) Any other project information deemed appropriate by the applicant or the board.

(3) Upon receiving an application for state assistance, the board shall review the application and notify the applicant of any additional information needed for a proper evaluation of the application.

(4) Any state assistance received pursuant to the act shall be used only for public purposes.

(5) Approval of an application for state assistance by the board after June 7, 2023, pursuant to section 13-2607 shall establish the area to be used for determining associated hotels and nearby retailers as the aggregate area or areas depicted in the map or maps accompanying the application for state assistance as submitted pursuant to subdivision (2)(c) of this section.

Laws 1999, LB 382, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB551, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB884, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 19;

Laws 2025, LB116, § 3.

Limitation on applications, see section 13-2612.